Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5673.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3i. (1) Within 15 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, Not later than January 14, 2025, each child care center shall develop a drinking water management plan and make the plan available to the department of licensing and regulatory affairs, lifelong education, advancement, and potential, child care center staff, and parents and guardians of children enrolled in the child care center on request. A child care center may consult with the local health department with jurisdiction in the area in which the child care center is located or a certified local contractor for the development of the plan. The plan must specify all of the following: (a) Locations where water outlets will be maintained to deliver water for human consumption, whether as drinking water or a component of a food or beverage, using the following categories, if applicable: (i) Locations where filtered bottle-filling stations will be maintained. (ii) Locations where filtered faucets will be maintained. (iii) Locations where filtered pitchers will be maintained. (iv) Locations where certified lead-free fixtures will be maintained. If certified lead-free fixtures are used in conjunction with PEX piping or a central reverse osmosis system, or both, the plan must include information regarding the PEX piping or central reverse osmosis system, or both, including the location where the central reverse osmosis system is installed. (v) Locations where any other filtration or fixture system that is certified to meet NSF/ANSI standard 53 for lead reduction and NSF/ANSI standard 42 for particulate removal and provides water with a lead concentration of not more than 5 parts per billion will be maintained. (vi) (iv) Locations where unfiltered drinking fountains or unfiltered faucets will be maintained, subject to section 3j(a). (vii) (v) Locations where drinking water from a water delivery service will be maintained. (b) Locations where water outlets will be maintained for purposes other than as described in subdivision (a), and whether the water outlets will utilize certified lead-free fixtures. (c) Locations where water outlets will be shut off or rendered permanently inoperable, if applicable. (d) Regular replacement of the filter cartridge for each filtered bottle-filling station, filtered faucet, and filtered pitcher in compliance with manufacturer instructions or recommendations of the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (2) Each child care center shall review and update the drinking water management plan created under subsection (1) at least once every 5 years and make changes as directed by the department of licensing and regulatory affairs lifelong education, advancement, and potential, or as needed to comply with this section. (3) Water Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8), water sampling and testing must be conducted at each child care center at least once every 2 years and as otherwise required under this section. The child care center shall collect the water for water sampling and testing. The water must be drawn from all of the bubble fixtures of the filtered bottle-filling stations and filtered faucets and must be collected in 250-milliliter bottles after at least an 8-hour stagnation period and before any water use occurs at the child care center. Upon On request, the department of licensing and regulatory affairs lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall provide the child care center with a sufficient number of 250-milliliter bottles. After the child care center collects the water, the child care center shall deliver, through the mail or in person, all of the 250-milliliter bottles for water testing. Water testing described under this section must be conducted at a laboratory certified for lead and copper testing for the approved EPA method. (4) If the water sampling and testing under subsection (3) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of 1 part per billion or more but not more than 5 parts per billion, the child care center shall do all of the following: (a) Immediately check the status of the filter or filters at the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet and replace the filter cartridge if the status light indicates that replacement is or will soon be required. (b) Ensure the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet is properly installed. (c) Resample and retest the water. (d) If the water sampling and testing under subdivision (c) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of 1 part per billion or more but not more than 5 parts per billion, have the child care center do both of the following: (i) Send a copy of the test results and a document that lists the make and model of the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet and filter cartridge to the department of licensing and regulatory affairs lifelong education, advancement, and potential, and the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (ii) Consult with the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy and the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet manufacturer. (5) If the water sampling and testing under subsection (3) or (4)(c) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of more than 5 parts per billion, the child care center shall do all of the following: (a) Immediately shut off or render inoperable the water outlet. (b) Post a conspicuous sign near the water outlet stating that the water outlet is inoperable because of high lead concentration and maintain the sign until the water outlet is returned to service under subdivision (e). (c) Replace the filter cartridge in the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet. (d) Resample and retest the water. (e) If the water sampling and testing under subdivision (d) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of 1 part per billion or more but not more than 5 parts per billion, return the water outlet to service and comply with the requirements of subsection (4)(b), (c), and (d). (f) If the water sampling and testing under subdivision (d) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of more than 5 parts per billion, do all of the following: (i) Within Not later than 30 days after receiving test results under this subsection, send a copy of the test results to the department of licensing and regulatory affairs, lifelong education, advancement, and potential, the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy, and each parent or guardian of a child enrolled in the child care center. (ii) Develop a remediation plan in consultation with the department of licensing and regulatory affairs lifelong education, advancement, and potential, and the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy and incorporate the remediation plan into the drinking water management plan under subsection (1). (6) A child care center that installs a filtered bottle-filling station, filtered faucet, filtered pitcher, or other filtered source shall install, operate, and maintain them in accordance with manufacturer instructions or recommendations of the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (7) A child care center shall retain the following documents, as applicable, for 3 years or until after any water sampling and testing occurs under this section, whichever is sooner, and make the documents available to the department of licensing and regulatory affairs lifelong education, advancement, and potential on request: (a) Original copies of the results of all water sampling and testing conducted under this section, as applicable. (b) Records of the dates when and locations where filters or filter cartridges were installed or replaced. (c) Installation instructions for each filter and filter cartridge installed by the child care center. (8) If a child care center identifies in its plan that the child care center is utilizing fixtures described under subsection (1)(a)(iv) or (v), or both, the child care center is not required to comply with the water sampling and testing requirements described under subsections (3) to (5) and is not required to install filtered bottle-filling stations, filtered faucets, filtered pitchers, or other filtered sources. (9) (8) As used in this section: (a) "Bubble fixture" means a fixture on a drinking water fountain through which water is forced up in a small arc from a nozzle that allows an individual to drink from the arc directly. (b) "Central reverse osmosis system" means a point-of-entry or centralized water treatment system that uses a semipermeable membrane and associated filters to remove dissolved solids, including lead and other contaminants, from the water supplied to multiple outlets within a building or facility. (c) "Certified lead-free fixtures" means plumbing fixtures, faucets, or components that meet the definition of lead-free under section 1417 of the safe drinking water act, 42 USC 300g?6, and are certified to meet NSF/ANSI standard 61. (d) "Certified local contractor" means a plumbing or mechanical contractor licensed under the skilled trades act, 2016 PA 407, MCL 339.5101 to 339.6133, or another contractor certified by the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy or the local health department to perform water sampling, plumbing, or filtration installation. (e) (b) "EPA" means the United States Environmental Protection Agency. (f) "Local health department" means that term as defined in section 1105 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.1105. (g) "PEX piping" means cross-linked polyethylene piping that meets ASTM standards F876 and F877 and is approved for potable water applications under R 408.30701 to R 408.30796 of the Michigan Administrative Code. Sec. 3j. (1) Within 2 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, Not later than October 14, 2025, each child care center shall do all of the following in a manner consistent with the drinking water management plan created under section 3i: (a) Post a conspicuous sign near each water outlet and drinking fountain indicating whether or not the outlet is intended to provide water for human consumption. If the water outlet or drinking fountain is intended to provide water for human consumption but is unfiltered and does not utilize a certified lead-free fixture, the sign must also state that the water is unfiltered and could contain lead. (b) Ensure that any water furnished to children for human consumption by the child care center is from a filtered faucet or other filtered source that is certified to meet NSF/ANSI standard 53 for lead reduction and NSF/ANSI standard 42 for particulate removal, or from a water delivery service, or from a water outlet that utilizes a certified lead-free fixture. (c) Make available to the public and notify the parent or guardian of each child enrolled in the child care center of the availability of both of the following, as applicable: (i) The results of all water sampling and testing conducted under section 3i. (ii) All filter and filter cartridge replacement dates for each filtered bottle-filling station, filtered faucet, filtered pitcher, or other filtered source. (2) The legislature shall annually appropriate to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential an amount sufficient to administer and comply with this section and sections 3i, 3k, and 3l. Child care centers are not required to comply with or otherwise incur costs under this section and sections 3i, 3k, and 3l, unless the legislature has appropriated sufficient funds under this subsection.